hyphenate_patterns/hyph-ro.tex
% title: Hyphenation patterns for Romanian
% copyright: Copyright (C) 1995-1996 Adrian Rezus
% notice: This file is part of the hyph-utf8 package.
%     See http://www.hyphenation.org/tex for more information.
% language:
%     name: Romanian
%     tag: ro
% version: 1.1 <29.10.1996> R [7.11.1996]
% authors:
%   -
%     name: Adrian Rezus
%     contact: adriaan (at) sci.kun.nl, adriaan (at) cs.kun.nl
% licence:
%     - text: [None]
% hyphenmins:
%     typesetting:
%         left: 2
%         right: 2
% changes:
%     - ROHYPHEN.TEX 1.0 <10.02.1995>: Plain TeX and LaTeX 2.09.
%     - ROHYPHEN.TEX 1.1 <29.10.1996>: Plain TeX and LaTeX2e.
% texlive:
%     encoding: ec
%     babelname: romanian
%     legacy_patterns: rohyphen.tex
%     message: Romanian hyphenation patterns
%     description: |-
%         Hyphenation patterns for Romanian in T1/EC and UTF-8 encodings.
%         The UTF-8 patterns use U+0219 for the character 's with comma accent'
%         and U+021B for 't with comma accent', but we may consider using U+015F
%         and U+0163 as well in the future.
%         Generated by PatGen2-output hyphen-level 9.
% ==========================================
% Contents: 647 Romanian hyphen patterns, with diacritics.
% NB Romanian has STRUCTURAL HYPHEN-AMBIGUA:
%     i.e., words that canNOT be hyphenated correctly without
%     additional (e.g., semantic, stress-mark) information.
% original patterns generated by PatGen2-output hyphen-level 9: do NOT modify the list by hand!
%
\patterns{
.a3ic
.a4n3is
.a2z
.cre1
.de2aj
.de2z1
.g4
.i2a
.i2e
.i3È›
.i4u3
.i3v
.Ã®4m
.n2
.ni2
.p4
.pre3È™
.s4
.È™4
.u4i
.u5ni
.z2
a1
2acÄƒ
achi5
a3e
afo3
a3i2a
a3i2e
a3il
ai3s2
a3iu
alie6
2alt
a2m
a2n
2an.
a5n2e
ani2e
ani3È™4
an4s
2anu
an2z
ao2g
ati4a
2atr
a5t4u
2aÈ›a
2aÈ›Äƒ
2au
a3ua
a3ud
a3ug
a3ul
a3un
a3ur
a3us
a3ute
a3u2È›
a3uz
2Äƒ1
Äƒ3i
Äƒi2e
Äƒ2m2
Äƒnu3
Äƒrgi5
Äƒ3È™
Äƒ4È™3t
Äƒ2ti.
Äƒti4e
Äƒ3u
Äƒ3v
Äƒ2zi
1b
2b.
ba2È›
bÄƒnu5
2bc
2bd
bi2a.
bi2at
bi2e
3bii
b2l
3b4lim
b4lu
bo1
bo3ric
2bs
2bt
2bÈ›
bÈ›i4ne.
bu3
1c
4c.
ca3ut
cÄƒ2c
cÄƒtu5
2cc
ce2a
ce2È›
2chi.
2ci.
ci3ale
ci2o
cis2
ci3sp
ciza2
c4l
2cm
2c5n
copia2tÄƒ
co2È›
2cs
2ct
2cÈ›
cu3im
3cul
cu2È›
2cv
1d
4d.
da4m
da2È›
2dc
de4sc
dez3in
di2an
dia2tÄƒ
2dj
2dm
2d1n
do4il
3du
e1ac
e1aj
e1al
e1aÈ™
e1at
ea2È›
e1av
ebu5i
2ec
eci2a
ecla2re
edi4ulu
e3e
ee2a
1efa
e1h
e3i2a
e3i2e
e3ii
e3il
e3im
e3in
e3i2o
e3i3s2
e3it
e3i4u
e1Ã®
2el
e2m
emon5
2en
e5ne
e1o1
e3on
e1r
2era
2erÄƒ
2erc
2e2s
es3co
es5ti
2eÈ™
e3È™i
etan4È›
2eÈ›
e3u
eu5È™
1evit
e2x
2ez
ezÄƒ5
ezi3a
e2z1o
1f4
2f.
3fa
3fÄƒÈ™
2fi.
fi3e
3fo
2ft
f5tu
1g2
2g.
gÄƒ3È›
2ghi.
2gi.
g4l
2g3m
2g3n
go5n
3gu3
2g3v
2h.
2hi.
hi2a
hi3c
hi4u
2h1n
2i1
4i.
3i2ac
ia3g4
i2ai
i2aÈ™
ia2È›
i3cÄƒ
i2ed
i3ia
i3ie
i3ii
i3il
i3in
i3ir
i3it
iitu2rÄƒ
i2Ã®
4ila
i3le
i3lo
imateri6
i2n
i4n1ed
in2gÄƒ
inÈ›i4i
3inv
i3od
i3oni
io2È›
ipÄƒ5
i2s
is3f
4isp
iÈ™3t
i5ti
iÈ›i2a
i3È›i2o
i3ua
i3ul
i3um
i3und
i3unu
i3us
i3ut
iz3v
Ã®2
Ã®3d
Ã®3e
Ã®3lo
Ã®na3
Ã®n5È™
Ã®3ri
Ã®3rÃ®
Ã®r5È™
Ã®È™3t
Ã®3t
Ã®4ti
Ã®3È›
Ã®4È›i
Ã®5È›ii
Ã®3z
1j
2j.
2jd
2ji.
ji2È›
2jl
j4u
ju3t
1k
1l
4l.
laraÈ›i2
lÄƒ2ti
lÄƒtu5
2lb
2lc
2ld
le2a
2lf
2lg
4li.
li3a
li3e
li3o
2lm
2l5n
2lp
2ls
2l3È™
2lt
2lÈ›
3lu
2lv
1m
2m.
3ma
3mÄƒ
2mb
mblÃ®n3
3me
me2z
2mf
3mi
4mi.
mi2È›
3mÃ®
2m1n
3mo
mon4
2mp
2m3s2
2mt
2mÈ›
3mu
mu2È›
2mv
4n.
3na
4n1ad
na3in
3nÄƒ
2nc
n2cis
n2ciz
2nd
3ne
ne1ab
ne1an
ne1ap
4nef
4n1eg
ne3s2
4nevi
4n1ex
2ng
ng3Äƒt
3ni
4ni.
ni3ez
3nÃ®
n3j
n1n
3no
no4È™
n1r
2n3s2
ns3f
n4sÃ®
ns3po
n3È™2
n4È™i
2nt
n5ti
n5t4u
2nÈ›
5nu
nu3a
nu3Äƒ
nu5m
nu3s2
2nz
o1ag
o2al
o2bi.
2oca
ocu5i
2od
odi2a
o3e
o3i2
oiecti2
oi3s2p
omedi2e.
om4n
2on
o1o
opi3e
opla2
oplagi2
o1ra
o1rÄƒ
or2c
o1re
o1ri
o2ric
o1rÃ®
o1ro
or2te.
o1ru
os5ti
o3È™i
otaÈ›i4
o5ti
ot3od
o3u
1p2
2p.
3pa
pÄƒr3È›
2p3c
pecÈ›i2
pe2È›
2pi.
pi2e
pi3e.
pi3ez
pi3o
pi2È›
pi2z
p4l
po4È™
po2È›
2p3s
2p3È™
2p3t
2p3È›
p4È›i.
pu3b4
puri2e
pu4È™
4r.
2rb
2rc
2rd
r2e
re2bi
recizi2
re3s2cr
re4È™i
2rf
2rg
2r1h
4ri.
ri3a
ri4ali
ri3eÈ›
ri3ez
ri5mi
2ri3un
ri3v
2rk
2rl
2rm
2r1n
rna2È›
rografi6
2rp
2r1r
2rs2
r3sp
r3st
2r3È™
2rt
rtua2le
2rÈ›
ru3il
ru3sp
2rv
2rz
1s
4s.
5sa
5sÄƒ
sÄƒ4m
sÄƒ4È™
2sc
4sc.
3s2co
3se
se2a
se4e.
ses2
se3sp
se4È™
4s2f
5sfÃ®
3si
si3p
3sÃ®
3s4l
4sm
s1n
3so
so3ric
2sp
2st
sto3
5su
su2È›
2È™
4È™.
3È™a
È™a2È›
3È™Äƒ2
3È™e
1È™i
4È™i.
5È™ii
5È™il
3È™in
3È™Ã®
4È™5n
È™nu5
3È™o
È™2p
È™2ti
4È™ti.
4È™3tr
3È™u
1t2
4t.
ta3ut
2t3c
2t3d
te2a
te5ni
teri6alÄƒ
te3s2p
2t3f
4ti.
ti3a
ti3e
3tii.
3til
3tin
ti2È›
2tÃ®.
t4l
2t3m
3tol
3tor
to2to
3tru.
3trul
3truo
4t3s2
2t3t
tu3a
tu3im
4t3un
tu4È™
4t3z
1È›
2È›.
3È›a
3È›Äƒ
È›e2È›
2È›i.
3È›ia
È›i3a.
3È›ie
3È›ii
3È›il
È›i2È›
3È›iu
È›u3
È›u5i
2u1
6u.
u2a.
u2ad
u3au
uÄƒ3
uÄƒs2
u2bia
u2b3l
u2b1o
ub3s2
u3e
4ugu
u3i2a
u3i2e
u3in
u3ir
u3is
u3it
u3i2È›
u3iz
u2l
u3la
u3lÄƒ
u3le
u3lii
u3lÃ®
u3lo
umi5r
ur2z
u2s
us2pr
u4st
u3È™
u4È™t
u2to
3utor
u3ui
u3um
1v
2v.
ve5ni
ve2È›
ve2z
2vi.
vi2È›
2v1n
vorbito2
3vr
1x
2x.
3xa
3xÄƒ
3xe
xe2z
3xi
3xo
3xu
1z
2z.
za2È›
2zb
2z2g
2zi.
zi2an
zi2ar
3zii
3zil
z4m
2z1n
3z2ol
3zon
zu2È›
2z2v
z3vÄƒ
}
